src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-nyany_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

# In case of stem-final ь AccPl ending is ё (not ьо).


  Noun - нянь: # Noun 'bread' - full paradigm /Type 11b/
     нянь+N+Sg+Nom: нянь
     нянь+N+Sg+Acc: няньмʼ
     нянь+N+Sg+Gen: няньʼ
     нянь+N+Sg+Dat: нянянʼ
     нянь+N+Sg+Loc: няньхана
     нянь+N+Sg+Abl: няньхад
     нянь+N+Sg+Pros: нянювна
     нянь+N+Du+Nom: няньхаʼ
     нянь+N+Du+Acc: няньхаʼ
     нянь+N+Du+Gen: няньхаʼ
     нянь+N+Pl+Nom: няньˮ
     нянь+N+Pl+Acc: нянё #! -ь + о = ё (нянь > нянё), й + о = ё
     нянь+N+Pl+Gen: нянёˮ
     нянь+N+Pl+Dat: няньхаˮ
     нянь+N+Pl+Loc: няньхаˮна
     нянь+N+Pl+Abl: няньхат
     нянь+N+Pl+Pros: нянёˮмана    

     хан+N+Tra: няньӈэ
     хан+N+Car: няньсиˮ
     хан+N+Equ: няньдаремʼ
     хан+N+Equ+Lat: няньдаревʼ
